src/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ nägünemä:nägü
!! * Yaml: __harinwma66,harinwma67 =>harinwma__
+V:ne FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:ne FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:ne FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_si ;
+V:e FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SC3_si_WEAKGRADE ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V:ne FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_däq ;
+V:ne FRONT_INF_däq ;
!+V+Err/Orth:nõ FRONT_INF_däq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:ne FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;
+V:ne%^WGStem FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;


LEXICON V_HARINÕMA
+V+WORK: # ;
LEXICON V_68HARKUMA
!! * Yaml: __V-harkuma68__
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SC-12_ZERO ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_daq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V: BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_68NÄLGÜMÄ
!! * Yaml: __V-naelguemae68__
+V: FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SC-12_ZERO ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_däq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V: FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;


LEXICON V_69HAARDUMA
+V+WORK: # ;

LEXICON V_69SÜNDÜMÄ
+V+WORK: # ;
LEXICON V_70UNÕHTUMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ unõhtuma:unõhtu
!! * Yaml: __V-unwhtuma__
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: BACK_IND-PRT-SC-12_ZERO ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_IND-PRT-SC-12_ZERO ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:%^WGStem V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_daq ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_INF_daq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_nuq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V: BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_70ERÄLDÜMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ eräldümä:eräldü
!! * Yaml: __V-eraelduemae__
+V: FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V: FRONT_IND-PRT-SC-12_ZERO ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_IND-PRT-SC-12_ZERO ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:%^WGStem V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_däq ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_INF_däq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_nüq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V: FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;


LEXICON V_71HALLÕTUMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ hallõtuma:hallõtu
!! * Yaml: __V-hallwtuma__
+V:%^WGStem BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^WGStem BACK_IND-PRT-SC-12_ZERO ;
+V:%^WGStem BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V: BACK_INF_daq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V: BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;


LEXICON V_71ERÄTÜMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ erätümä:erätü
!! * Yaml: __V-eraetuemae__
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^WGStem FRONT_IND-PRT-SC-12_ZERO ;
+V:%^WGStem FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V: FRONT_INF_däq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V: FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_72VAOMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ vaoma:vao
!! * Yaml: __vaoma__
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:%^StrGStem BACK_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V: BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_72HÄÖMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ häömä:häö
!! * Yaml: __haeoemae__
+V: FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V:%^StrGStem FRONT_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V: FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_73VAOMA
+V+WORK: # ;
LEXICON V_74KULUMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ kuluma:kulu
!! * Yaml: __V-kuluma__
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^StrGStem BACK_IND-PRT-SC-12_ZERO ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:%^StrGStem BACK_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;
+V: BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V: BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_74VÄSÜMÄ !!≈ * __@CODE@__ väsümä:väsü
!! * Yaml: __V-vaesuemae__
+V: FRONT_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRS-SC3_s ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^StrGStem FRONT_IND-PRT-SC-12_ZERO ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^StrGStem V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V: FRONT_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: FRONT_INF_mä ;
+V:%^StrGStem FRONT_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: FRONT_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nüq ;
+V: FRONT_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_täv ;
+V: FRONT_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V_75VALAMA !!≈ * __@CODE@__ valama:vala
!! * Yaml: __V-valama75__
!! vala, valla, vali, valõ
!!test
+V: V0_75VALAMA ;

!!
+V: BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SC-12 ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRS-CONNEG ;
+V: V0-IND-PRS-SCSG3_ZERO ;
+V:BACK_V0-IND-PRS-SCPL3_iaq ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRS ;

+V:%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SC-12_i ;
+V: BACK_ACT-IND-PRT-CONNEG ;
+V:%^VowRM V0-IND-PRT-SCSG3_i ;
+V: BACK_VISKAMA_PSS-IND-PRT_ti ;

+V: BACK_INF_ma ;
+V:%^Pen%^StrGStem BACK_INF_ZEROq ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRS-PRC_v ;
+V: BACK_ACT-PRF-PRC_WEAKGRADE-nuq ;

+V:%^VowRM%>õ BACK_V0-PSS-PRS-PRC_tav ;
+V:%^VowRM%>õ BACK_PSS-PRF-PRC_t ;

LEXICON V0_75VALAMA
+Inf/mA:%>ma # ;
+Inf:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>q # ;
+Act+PrfPrc:%>nuq # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc:%^VowRM%>õt # ;
+Pss+PrfPrc:%^VowRM%>õtu # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%> # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>t # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg2:%>dõq # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%> # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%>s # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl1:%>miq # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl2:%>tiq # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>vaq # ;
+Act+Ind+Prs+Pl3:%>sõq # ;
+Act+Ind+ConNegII:%> # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg1:%^VowRM%>i # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^VowRM%>iq # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^VowRM%>idõq # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg2:%^VowRM%>it # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Sg3:%^VowRM%>i # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl1:%^VowRM%>imiq # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl2:%^VowRM%>itiq # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^VowRM%>iq # ;
+Act+Ind+Prt+Pl3:%^VowRM%>ivaq # ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg1:%^VowRM%>õda # ;
+Pss+Ind+Prs+Sg3:%^VowRM%>õtas # ;
+Act+PrsPrc+Sg+Nom:%^Pen%^StrGStem%>v # ;
+Jus:%>guq # ;
