src/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
ajama:aja V_75VALAMA  "" ;
edenemä:ede V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ  "" ;
erätümä:erätü V_71ERÄTÜMÄ  "" ;
hallõtuma:hallõtu V_71HALLÕTUMA  "" ;
heitümä:heitü V_69SÜNDÜMÄ  "" ;
helümä:helümä V_74VÄSÜMÄ  "" ;
helʼoma:helʼo V_74KULUMA  "" ;
heränemä:herä V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ  "" ;
hiitümä:hiitü V_69SÜNDÜMÄ  "" ;
himmästümä:himmästü V_70ERÄLDÜMÄ  "" ;
hupsahtuma:hupsahtu V_70UNÕHTUMA  "" ;
häädümä:häädü V_68NÄLGÜMÄ  "" ;
häömä:hä%^V7ö V_72HÄÖMÄ  "" ;
hõlʼoma:hõlʼo V_74KULUMA  "" ;
idänemä:idänemä V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ  "" ;
ikeldümä:ikeldü V_70ERÄLDÜMÄ  "" ;
ilmuma:ilmu V_68HARKUMA  "" ;
indsümä:indsü V_68NÄLGÜMÄ  "" ;
jaahtuma:jaahtu V_69SÜNDÜMÄ  "" ;
jaahutama:jaahuta V_69SÜNDÜMÄ  "" ;
jahmahtuma:jahmahtu V_70UNÕHTUMA  "" ;
johtuma:johtu V_69HAARDUMA  "" ;
jouduma:joudu V_69HAARDUMA  "" ;
jõõrduma:jõõrdu V_69HAARDUMA  "" ;
kaalduma:kaaldu V_68HARKUMA  "" ;
kahvahtuma:kahvahtu V_70UNÕHTUMA  "" ;
kalduma:kaldu V_69HAARDUMA  "" ;
kalluma:kallu V_69HAARDUMA  "" ;
kanduma:kandu V_69HAARDUMA  "" ;
kaoma:ka%^T7o V_72VAOMA  "" ;
kelpümä:kelpü V_69SÜNDÜMÄ  "" ;
kimmätümä:kimmätü V_70ERÄLDÜMÄ  "" ;
kopituma:kopitu V_70UNÕHTUMA  "" ;
kruntsʼuma:kruntsʼu V_68HARKUMA  "" ;
kuluma:kulu V_74KULUMA  "" ;
kumahtuma:kumahtu V_70UNÕHTUMA  "" ;
kuulduma:kuuldu V_69HAARDUMA  "" ;
käändümä:käändü V_70ERÄLDÜMÄ  "" ;
käärümä:käärü V_69SÜNDÜMÄ  "" ;
küdsämä:küdsä V_75VALAMA  "" ;
küsümä:küsü V_74VÄSÜMÄ  "" ;
küttümä:küttü V_68NÄLGÜMÄ  "" ;
laihtuma:laihtu V_68HARKUMA  "" ;
lapahtuma:lapahtu V_70UNÕHTUMA  "" ;
liindümä:liindü V_68NÄLGÜMÄ  "" ;
lägünemä:lägü V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ  "" ;
lähünemä:lähü V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ  "" ;
läügähtümä:läügähtü V_68NÄLGÜMÄ  "" ;
läükümä:läükü V_68NÄLGÜMÄ  "" ;
löüdümä:löüdümä V_69SÜNDÜMÄ  "" ;
mahtuma:mahtu V_69HAARDUMA  "" ;
miildümä:miildü V_68NÄLGÜMÄ  "" ;
muttʼuma:muttʼu V_68HARKUMA  "" ;
mädänemä:mädänemä V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ  "" ;
mõoma:mõo V_72VAOMA  "" ;
mõrahtuma:mõrahu V_70UNÕHTUMA  "" ;
neelähtümä:neelähtü V_70ERÄLDÜMÄ  "" ;
nessümä:nessü V_69SÜNDÜMÄ  "" ;
nestümä:nestü V_68NÄLGÜMÄ  "" ;
nilguma:nilgu V_68HARKUMA  "" ;
nägünemä:nägü V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ  "" ;
nägünemä:nägüne V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ  "" ;
nõatuma:nõatu V_71HALLÕTUMA  "" ;
nõõtuma:nõõtu V_71HALLÕTUMA  "" ;
nühkümä:nühkü V_68NÄLGÜMÄ  "" ;
nührümä:nührü V_69SÜNDÜMÄ  "" ;
nülünemä:nülü V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ  "" ;
nülünemä:nülüne V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ  "" ;
nülüvämä:nülüvä V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ  "" ;
nülüvämä:nülüvä V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ  "" ;
oiduma:oidu V_69HAARDUMA  "" ;
oiguma:oigu V_68HARKUMA  "" ;
ojoma:ojo V_74KULUMA  "" ;
pehmehümä:pehmehü V_70ERÄLDÜMÄ  "" ;
piirdümä:piirdü V_68NÄLGÜMÄ  "" ;
pinitümä:pinitü V_70ERÄLDÜMÄ  "" ;
praatʼuma:praatʼu V_68HARKUMA  "" ;
prällümä:prällü V_68NÄLGÜMÄ  "" ;
puhastuma:puhastu V_70UNÕHTUMA  "" ;
purjoma:purjo V_68HARKUMA  "" ;
päinemä:päi V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ  "" ;
püsümä:püsü V_74VÄSÜMÄ  "" ;
püürdümä:püürdümä V_69SÜNDÜMÄ  "" ;
rappuma:rappu V_69HAARDUMA  "" ;
rebähümä:rebähü V_70ERÄLDÜMÄ  "" ;
rudihuma:rudihu V_70UNÕHTUMA  "" ;
rutjuma:rutju V_68HARKUMA  "" ;
räntsümä:räntsü V_68NÄLGÜMÄ  "" ;
sellätümä:sellätü V_71ERÄTÜMÄ  "" ;
sellätümä:selätü V_71ERÄTÜMÄ  "" ;
seletümä:seletü V_70ERÄLDÜMÄ  "" ;
siginemä:siginemä V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ  "" ;
sõõrduma:sõõrdu V_68HARKUMA  "" ;
süttümä:süttü V_69SÜNDÜMÄ  "" ;
süändümä:süändü V_70ERÄLDÜMÄ  "" ;
süüdümä:süüdü V_68NÄLGÜMÄ  "" ;
takõlduma:takõldu V_70UNÕHTUMA  "" ;
tirkuma:tirku V_68HARKUMA  "" ;
todima:todi V_75VALAMA  "" ;
tsuskuma:tsusku V_68HARKUMA  "" ;
tsʼobahtuma:tsʼobahtu V_70UNÕHTUMA  "" ;
tuulduma:tuuldu V_69HAARDUMA  "" ;
täkeldümä:täkeldü V_70ERÄLDÜMÄ  "" ;
täümä:täü V_72HÄÖMÄ  "" ;
tüdinemä:tüdi V_67NÄGÜNEMÄ  "" ;
ujoma:ujo V_74KULUMA  "" ;
uppuma:uppu V_69HAARDUMA  "" ;
vaagatuma:vaagatu V_70UNÕHTUMA  "" ;
vaihtuma:vaihtu V_68HARKUMA  "" ;
vaivuma:vaivuma% II V_69SÜNDÜMÄ  "" ;
valama:vala V_75VALAMA  "" ;
vannuma:vannu V_69HAARDUMA  "" ;
vaoma:va%^I7o V_72VAOMA  "" ;
viguma:vigu V_74KULUMA  "" ;
viibümä:viibü V_68NÄLGÜMÄ  "" ;
villitümä:villitü V_70ERÄLDÜMÄ  "" ;
vinümä:vinü V_74VÄSÜMÄ  "" ;
väemä:väe V_72HÄÖMÄ  "" ;
väsümä:väsü V_74VÄSÜMÄ  "" ;
väärähtümä:väärähtü V_70ERÄLDÜMÄ  "" ;
vüürdümä:vüürdümä V_69SÜNDÜMÄ  "" ;
õnnahtuma:õnnahtu V_70UNÕHTUMA  "" ;
